it: Parte del corpo: Addome; Braccia; Schiena; Linea bikini; Natiche; Polpacci; Cassa; Occhi; Viso; Piedi; Corpo intero; Tendini del ginocchio; Mani; Testa; Talloni; Fianchi; Ginocchia; Gambe; Labbra; Zona lombare; Collo; Spalle; Piante del piede; Cosce; Dita dei piedi; Vita; Polsi; Altro
ja: 身体の部位: 腹部; 腕; 背中; ビキニライン; 臀部; ふくらはぎ; チェスト; 目; 顔; 足; 全身; ハムストリング; 手; 頭; かかと; ヒップ; 膝; 脚; 唇; 腰部; 首; 肩; 足裏; 太もも; つま先; 腰; 手首; その他
nl: Lichaamsgebied: Buikspier; Armen; Rug; Bikinilijn; Zitvlak; Kuiten; Borst; Ogen; Gezicht; Voeten; Volledige lichaam; Hamstrings; Handen; Hoofd; Hakken; Heupen; Knieën; Poten; Lippen; Lumbaal gebied; Nek; Schouders; Zolen; Dijen; Tenen; Taille; Polsen; Andere
de: Körperstelle: Kahnbauch; Arme; Rücken; Bikinizone; Gesäß; Unterschenkel; Truhe; Augen; Gesicht; Füße; Ganzkörper; Hintere Oberschenkel; Hände; Kopf; Fersen; Hüften; Knie; Beine; Lippen; Lendenbereich; Hals; Schultern; Sohlen; Schenkel; Zehen; Taille; Handgelenke; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Područje tijela: Trbuh; Ruke; Leđa; Bikini zona; Stražnjica; Listovi; Prsa; Oči; Lice; Stopala; Cijelo tijelo; Stražnja loža; Ruke; Glava; Pete; Kukovi; Koljena; Noge; Usne; Lumbalna regija; Vrat; Ramena; Tabani; Bedra; Nožni prsti; Struk; Zapešća; Ostalo
pt-PT: Área do corpo: Abdómen; Braços; Costas; Linha do biquíni; Nádegas; Barriga das pernas; Arca; Olhos; Rosto; Pés; Corpo inteiro; Gémeos; Mãos; Cabeça; Calcanhares; Ancas; Joelhos; Pernas; Lábios; Região lombar; Pescoço; Ombros; Planta do pé; Coxas; Dedos do pé; Cintura; Pulsos; Outro
nb: Kroppsområde: Mageregion; Armer; Rygg; Bikinilinje; Rumpe; Legger; Bryst; Øyne; Ansikt; Føtter; Hele kroppen; Hamstrings; Hender; Hode; Hæler; Hofter; Knær; Ben; Lepper; Korsryggområde; Hals; Skuldre; Såler; Lår; Tær; Midje; Håndledd; Annen
bg-BG: Област на тялото: Корем; Ръце; Гръб; Линия на бикините; Седалищни части; Прасци; Гръден кош; Очи; Лице; Крака; Цяло тяло; Подколенни сухожилия; Ръце; Глава; Пети; Ханш; Колене; Крака; Устни; Лумбална област; Врат; Рамене; Стъпала; Бедра; Пръсти на краката; Талия; Китки; Други
tr: Gövde Alanı: Karın; Kollar; Sırt; Bikini çizgisi; Kalça; Baldırlar; Göğüs; Gözler; Yüz; Ayaklar; Tüm vücut; Diz arkası kirişleri; Eller; Kafa; Topuklular; Kalçalar; Dizler; Bacaklar; Dudaklar; Bel bölgesi; Boyun; Omuzlar; Tabanlar; Uyluk; Ayak parmakları; Bel; Bilekler; Diğer
hu: Test területe: Has; Kar; Hát; Bikinivonal; Fenék; Lábszár; Mellkas; Szem; Arc; Láb; Teljes test; Térdszalag; Kéz; Fej; Sarok; Csípő; Térd; Láb; Ajak; Ágyékterület; Nyak; Váll; Talp; Comb; Lábujj; Derék; Csukló; Egyéb
sk-SK: Oblasť tela: Brucho; Ruky; Chrbát; Línia bikín; Zadok; Lýtka; Hrudník; Oči; Tvár; Nohy; Celé telo; Šľachy; Ruky; Hlava; Päty; Boky; Kolená; Nohy; Pery; Bedrová oblasť; Krk; Ramená; Podrážky; Stehná; Prsty na nohách; Pás; Zápästia; Iné
es: Área del cuerpo: Abdomen; Brazos; Espalda; Línea de bikini; Glúteos; Pantorrillas; Arcón; Ojos; Rostro; Pies; Cuerpo completo; Isquiotibiales; Manos; Cabeza; Tacones; Caderas; Rodillas; Patas; Labios; Región lumbar; Cuello; Espalda; Suelas; Muslos; Dedos de los pies; Cintura; Muñecas; Otros
el: Περιοχή σώματος: Κοιλιά; Βραχίονες; Πλάτη; Γραμμή μπικίνι; Γλουτοί; Γάμπες; Στήθος; Μάτια; Πρόσωπο; Πέλματα; Όλο το σώμα; Οπίσθιοι μηριαίοι; Χέρια; Κεφάλι; Φτέρνες; Γοφοί; Γόνατα; Πόδια; Χείλια; Οσφυϊκή περιοχή; Λαιμός; Ώμοι; Πατούσες; Μηροί; Δάχτυλα των ποδιών; Μέση; Καρποί; Άλλο
pt-BR: Área do corpo: Abdômen; Braços; Costas; Linha do biquíni; Nádegas; Bezerros; Baú; Olhos; Rosto; Pés; Corpo completo; Isquiotibiais; Mãos; Cabeça; Calcanhares; Quadris; Joelhos; Pernas; Lábios; Região lombar; Pescoço; Ombros; Solas; Coxas; Dedos do pé; Cintura; Pulsos; Outro
zh-TW: 身體部位: 腹部; 武器; 後退; 比基尼線; 臀部; 小腿; 櫃式; 眼睛; 臉; 腳; 全身; 腿筋; 手; 頭; 高跟鞋; 臀部; 膝蓋; 腿; 嘴唇; 腰椎部位; 脖子; 肩膀; 鞋底板; 大腿; 腳趾; 腰部; 手腕; 其他
ru: Область тела: Живот; Руки; Спина; Линия бикини; Ягодицы; Икры; Грудь; Глаза; Лицо; Стопы; Все тело; Подколенные сухожилия; Руки; Голова; Пятки; Бедра; Колени; Ноги; Губы; Область поясницы; Шея; Плечи; Подошвы; Бедра; Пальцы ног; Талия; Запястья; Другое
pl: Obszar treści: Brzuch; Ręce; Wstecz; Linia bikini; Pośladki; Łydki; Klatka piersiowa; Oczy; Twarz; Stopy; Całe ciało; Ścięgna podkolanowe; Dłonie; Głowica; Pięty; Biodra; Kolana; Nogi; Usta; Okolica lędźwiowa; Szyja; Ramiona; Podeszwy; Uda; Palce u stóp; Talia; Nadgarstki; Pozostałe
cs: Část těla: Břicho; Paže; Záda; Třísla; Hýždě; Lýtka; Na prsa; Oči; Obličej; Chodidla; Celé tělo; Hamstringy; Ruce; Hlava; Podpatky; Boky; Kolena; Nohy; Rty; Bederní oblast; Krk; Ramena; Plosky nohou; Stehna; Prsty na nohách; Pas; Zápěstí; Jiné
fr: Zone du corps: Abdomen; Bras; Dos; Ligne de bikini; Fesses; Mollets; Poitrine; Yeux; Visage; Pieds; Tout le corps; Hamstrings; Mains; Tête; Talons; Hanches; Genoux; Cuisses; Lèvres; Région lombaire; Cou; Épaules; Semelles; Cuisses; Orteils; Taille; Poignets; Autre
th: พื้นที่ร่างกาย: ท้องน้อย; แขน; หลัง; บิกินี่ไลน์; บั้นท้าย; น่อง; หน้าอก; ดวงตา; ใบหน้า; เท้า; ทั้งตัว; เอ็นร้อยหวาย; มือ; ศีรษะ; ส้นเท้า; สะโพก; เข่า; ขา; ริมฝีปาก; บริเวณบั้นเอว; คอ; ไหล่; ฝ่าเท้า; ต้นขา; นิ้วเท้า; เอว; ข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Kūno sritis: Pilvas; Rankos; Nugara; Bikinio zona; Sėdmenys; Blauzdos; Krūtinė; Akys; Veidas; Pėdos; Visas kūnas; Užpakaliniai šlaunies raumenys; Plaštakos; Galva; Kulnai; Klubai; Keliai; Kojos; Lūpos; Juosmens sritis; Kaklas; Pečiai; Padai; Šlaunys; Kojų pirštai; Juosmuo; Riešai; Kita
vi: Vùng cơ thể: Bụng; Cánh tay; Lưng; Tôn dáng vùng bikini; Mông; Bắp chân; Tủ ngăn kéo; Mắt; Khuôn mặt; Chân; Toàn cơ thể; Cơ đùi sau; Tay; Đầu; Gót chân; Hông; Đầu gối; Chân; Môi; Vùng thắt lưng; Cổ; Vai; Đế; Đùi; Ngón chân; Eo; Cổ tay; Khác
zh-CN: 身体部位: 腹部; 手臂; 背部; 比基尼线; 臀部; 小牛; 箱子; 眼睛; 面部; 脚; 全身; 腘绳肌; 手; 头; 高跟鞋; 髋; 膝盖; 腿; 嘴唇; 腰区; 颈项; 肩膀; 脚掌; 大腿; 脚趾; 腰部; 手腕; 其他
fi: Kehoalue: Vatsa; Käsivarret; Selkä; Bikiniraja; Pakarat; Pohkeet; Rintakehä; Silmät; Kasvot; Jalat; Koko vartalo; Reisilihakset; Kädet; Pää; Korot; Lonkat; Polvet; Jalat; Huulet; Ristiselkä; Niska; Hartiat; Jalkapohjat; Reidet; Varpaat; Vyötärö; Ranteet; Muu
ro-RO: Zonă corp: Abdomen; Brațe; Spate; Linia bikinilor; Fese; Gambe; Piept; Ochi; Față; Labele picioarelor; Întregul corp; Tendon popliteu; Mâini; Cap; Călcâie; Șolduri; Genunchi; Picioare; Buze; Regiunea lombară; Gât; Umeri; Tălpi; Coapse; Degete de la picioare; Talie; Încheieturi; Altele
ko: 신체 부위: 복부; 팔; 등; 비키니 라인; 궁둥이; 송아지; 궤; 눈; 얼굴; 발; 전신; 햄스트링; 손; 머리; 발꿈치; 엉덩이; 무릎; 다리; 입술; 요추 부위; 목; 어깨; 발바닥; 허벅지; 발가락; 허리; 손목; 기타
da: Kropsareal: Maveregion; Arme; Ryg; Bikinilinje; Balder; Lægge; Bryst; Øjne; Ansigt; Fødder; Fuld krop; Lårmuskler; Hænder; Hoved; Hæle; Hofter; Knæ; Ben; Læber; Lænderegion; Nakke; Skuldre; Såler; Lår; Tæer; Talje; Håndled; Andet
sl-SI: Predel telesa: Trebuh; Roke; Hrbet; Bikini linija; Zadnjica; Meča; Prsni koš; Oči; Obraz; Stopala; Celo telo; Stegenske mišice; Dlani; Glava; Pete; Boki; Kolena; Noge; Ustnice; Ledveni predel; Vrat; Ramena; Podplati; Stegna; Prsti na nogah; Pas; Zapestja; Drugo
sv: Kroppsdel: Buk; Armar; Rygg; Bikinilinje; Rumpa; Vader; Bröst; Ögon; Ansikte; Fötter; Hela kroppen; Baksida lår; Händer; Huvud; Hälar; Höfter; Knän; Ben; Läppar; Ländryggen; Nacke; Axlar; Sulor; Lår; Tår; Midja; Handleder; Annat
en: Body area: Abdomen; Arms; Back; Bikini line; Buttocks; Calves; Chest; Eyes; Face; Feet; Full body; Hamstrings; Hands; Head; Heels; Hips; Knees; Legs; Lips; Lumbar region; Neck; Shoulders; Soles; Thighs; Toes; Waist; Wrists; Other